Arkansas, session 2025, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 45, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 - Child and Adolescent Mental Health Surveys

20-45-401. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to advance mental healthcare quality
and access for children and adolescents from birth to nineteen (19) years of
age in this state and to ensure that all children and adolescents from birth
to nineteen (19) years of age in this state have the best possible mental
health outcomes.

20-45-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Childcare facility" means the same as defined in § 20-78-
*JMB198*
02-04-2025 10:16:30 JMB198

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1179
202;
(2) "Mental health surveys program" means a child mental health
surveys program selected by a public school, open enrollment charter school,
private school, or childcare facility that has been approved by the
Department of Human Services in consultation with the Department of
Education; and
(3) "Participating student" means a child or student who:
(A) Is nineteen (19) years of age or younger;
(B) Is enrolled in a public school, open enrollment
charter school, private school, or childcare facility; and
(C) Participates in a mental health survey program upon
the consent of his or her parent or guardian.

20-45-403. Child mental health survey.
(a) A public school, open enrollment charter school, private school,
or childcare facility shall implement a mental health survey for
participating students using an evidence-based survey program.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall establish:
(1) A process for a public school, open enrollment charter
school, private school, or childcare facility to submit a selected mental
health survey program for approval;
(2) In accordance with the Family Education Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, who may access and use a participating student's
mental health survey data; and
(3) A requirement and a process for a public school, open
enrollment charter school, private school, or childcare facility or
associated personnel to attend annual training related to administering the
mental health survey program.
(c) In consultation with the Department of Education, the Department
of Human Services shall approve an evidence-based student mental health
survey program selected by a public school, open enrollment charter school,
private school, or childcare facility that:
(1) Is age appropriate for each age in which the mental health
survey program is administered;
(2) Surveys for the mental health conditions determined by the
Department of Human Services and the Department of Education; and
02-04-2025 10:16:30 JMB198

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1179
(3) Is an effective tool for identifying whether a participating
student has a mental health condition that requires intervention.
(d) A public school, open enrollment charter school, private school,
or childcare facility shall:
(1) Submit a mental health survey program to the Department of
Human Services for approval;
(2) Administer a mental health survey program to participating
students;
(3) Obtain prior written consent from a participating student's
parent or guardian that complies with the Family Education Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, before the public school, open enrollment charter
school, private school, or childcare facility administers the mental health
survey program to a participating student; and
(4) If results of a mental health survey of a participating
student indicates a potential mental health condition, notify the parent or
guardian of the participating student of:
(A) The participating student's results; and
(B) Resources available to the participating student,
including any services that can be provided by a mental health provider or
entity that partners with the public school, open enrollment charter school,
private school, or childcare facility.
(e)(1) If funds are appropriated, the Department of Human Services may
distribute funds to a public school, open enrollment charter school, private
school, or childcare facility to use to assist a parent or guardian to pay
for resources described in subdivision (d)(4)(B) of this section that cannot
be provided by a school mental health professional in the school setting.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall establish the
criteria and process for:
(A) Determining whether a parent or guardian is eligible
to receive the financial support described in subdivision (e)(1) of this
section; and
(B) Applying for and distributing the financial support
described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(f) An employee of a public school, open enrollment charter school,
private school, or childcare facility who is trained and administers an
approved mental health survey in accordance with this section in good faith
02-04-2025 10:16:30 JMB198

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1179
is not liable in a civil action for an act or omission under this section.

/s/Vaught

































02-04-2025 10:16:30 JMB198